Arkansas, session 2025, HB1448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-56-412(g), concerning powers and duties
of a municipal planning commission, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1) Referral to Bodies Responsible for Land Acquisition. After
adoption and filing as provided of a community facilities plan or a master
street plan, no parcel of land indicated by the plan which lies within the
bounds of a proposed public use facility or mapped street shall be privately
developed until the public board, commission, or body having jurisdiction or
financial responsibility for the reserved area shall have refused in writing
to execute a written option negotiated in good faith by the public board,
commission, or body and the property owner or to file suit for condemnation
to acquire the area.
(2)(A) This refusal Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2)(E)
of this section, a written refusal to execute a written option or to file
suit for condemnation to acquire the area under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section shall be given by the public board, commission, or body within one
(1) year of from the date the action is requested by the property owner.
*SSS028*
02/11/2025 8:20:32 AM SSS028

HB1448
(B) This The restriction on private development under
subdivision (g)(1) of this section may be enforced for the specified one (1)
year period by the refusal to issue building permits or by other methods.
(C) However, it The restriction on private development
under subdivision (g)(1) of this section may be enforced only in cases where
in which regulations governing the development and subdivision of land do not
apply.
(D) If the public board, commission, or body does not
execute a written refusal, execute a written option, or file a suit for
condemnation within the time period prescribed in subdivision (g)(2)(A) of
this section:
(i) The parcel of land shall be released from
reservation; and
(ii)(a) The public board, commission, or body shall
pay the owner of the parcel of land reasonable compensation for the
diminished value of the parcel of land during the period prescribed in
subdivision (g)(2)(A) of this section.
(b) Reasonable compensation under subdivision
(g)(2)(D)(ii)(a) of this section shall be determined by the amount that the
value of the parcel of land diminished as a result of the delay in the
development of the parcel of land required by the reservation of the parcel
of land by the public board, commission, or body having jurisdiction.
(E) For a community facilities plan or a master street
plan approved on or before the effective date of this act, written refusal to
execute a written option or to file suit for condemnation to acquire the area
under this subsection shall be given by the public board, commission, or body
within six (6) months from the effective date of this act.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 14-56-422(1), concerning the procedure for
the adoption of plans, ordinances, and regulations by a municipal planning
commission, is amended to read as follows:
(1)(A) The planning commission shall hold a public hearing on
the plans, ordinances, and regulations proposed under this subchapter.
(B) Notice of public hearing shall be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the city at least one (1) time fifteen
(15) days prior to the hearing.
02/11/2025 8:20:32 AM SSS028

HB1448
(C) Notice by first class mail to the boards of directors
of all school districts affected by a proposed plan, ordinance, or regulation
shall be provided sufficiently in advance to allow representatives of all
affected school districts a reasonable opportunity to submit comments on any
proposed plan, ordinance, or regulation.
(D) Notice by first class mail to the owner of a parcel of
land affected by a proposed plan, ordinance, or regulation shall be provided
sufficiently in advance to allow any owner of an affected parcel of land a
reasonable opportunity to submit comments on the proposed plan, ordinance, or
regulation;


























02/11/2025 8:20:32 AM SSS028